Hawaii statutes.
§425-158 Statement of foreign
qualification. A statement of foreign qualification shall contain:

(1) The name of the foreign limited liability
partnership, which name complies with the law of the state or other
jurisdiction under which the foreign limited liability partnership is formed;

(2) A statement that the partnership elects to be a
foreign limited liability partnership; and

(3) The mailing address of the partnership's
principal office and the information required by section 425R-4(a). [L 2000, c
218, pt of §1; am L 2001, c 241, §5; am L 2002, c 130, §89; am L 2004, c 121,
§31; am L 2006, c 184, §19 and c 235, §13; am L 2009, c 55, §36]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next